Hawaii statutes.
§264-77 Penalty. Any person violating
this part shall be fined not less than $25 nor more than $500, or imprisoned
not more than one month, or both. [L 1966, c 45, pt of §2; HRS §264-77]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next